Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB489.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6120(a) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6120. Limitation on the regulation of firearms and ammunition.(a) General rule.--[No county, municipality or township] Except as provided in subsection (a.4), no political subdivision may in any manner regulate the lawful ownership, possession, transfer or transportation of firearms, ammunition or ammunition components when carried or transported for purposes not prohibited by the laws of this Commonwealth.* * *1234567891011121314151617181920 (a.4) Exception.--A political subdivision may, by ordinance, regulate the possession, transfer or transportation of firearms, ammunition or ammunition components when carried or transported on any property owned, operated or maintained by the political subdivision, including, but not limited to:(1) Buildings.(2) Parks.(3) Conveyances or vehicles.* * *Section 2. Section 2962(g) of Title 53 is repealed:§ 2962. Limitation on municipal powers.* * *[(g) Regulation of firearms.--A municipality shall not enact any ordinance or take any other action dealing with the regulation of the transfer, ownership, transportation or possession of firearms.]* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0489PN0468 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718